Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 6. Transportation of Fish and Shellfish.

Sec. 16.10.240.
Transportation of live crab.

A person may not take out of or ship, transport, or send from this state any commercially taken live crab, unless the crab have been landed in a port in the state and recorded on a fish ticket form prescribed by the department.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, live crab may be taken, shipped, transported, or sent from the state by means of surface transportation only if the crab are taken at a time and location in the state for which the Department of Environmental Conservation does not require seafood processors to test crab for the presence of marine toxins.

History.

(§ 1 ch 33 SLA 1962; am § 2 ch 5 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 14 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 78 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 25 SLA 2020)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective July 28, 2020, rewrote (a); and in (b), twice deleted “Dungeness” before “crab”, deleted “, species Cancer magister” near the beginning of the subsection, and added “only” after “surface transportation”.

Collateral references. —

35A Am. Jur. 2d, Fish, Game and Wildlife Conservation, § 55.

Sec. 16.10.250.
Penalty.

A person, association, or corporation violating AS

16.10.240

or contributing to or cooperating in the violation of AS

16.10.240

is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.
Each unlawful removal of live crab is a separate offense.
Vessels and equipment used in or in aid of a violation of AS 16.10.240 may be seized and disposed of as provided in AS

16.05.190

. Conviction under AS 16.10.240 is grounds for suspension of a fishing license or permit by the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 33 SLA 1962)